New Jersey, session 222, S4226.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 27 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-27) is amended to read as follows: 27.  a.  (1) Any grant awarded by the State to a local government unit to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes shall be for [25%] 50 percent of the cost of acquisition[, except that the trust may authorize an increase in the State's share of the cost to a maximum of 50% upon a demonstration of special need or exceptional circumstances]. (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection to the contrary: (a) a grant by the State for lands acquired for recreation and conservation purposes by a qualifying open space referendum county or a qualifying open space referendum municipality shall be for [50%] 80 percent of the cost of acquisition of the lands by that county or municipality [, except that the trust may authorize an increase in the State's share of the cost to a maximum of 75% upon a demonstration of special need or exceptional circumstances]; and (b) a grant by the State for lands acquired or developed for recreation and conservation purposes by a local government unit in a municipality eligible to receive State aid pursuant to P.L.1978, c.14 (C.52:27D-178 et seq.) shall be for [50%] 80 percent of the cost of acquisition or development of the lands by the local government unit [, except that the trust may authorize an increase in the State's share of the cost to a maximum of 75% upon a demonstration of special need or exceptional circumstances]. b.    A loan by the State for lands to be acquired or developed by a local government unit for recreation and conservation purposes may include up to 100% of the cost of acquisition or development of the lands by the local government unit, shall bear interest of not more than 2% per year, and shall be for a term of not more than 30 years for an acquisition project and not more than 20 years for a development project. c.  (1) A grant by the State for lands to be acquired or developed by a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization for recreation and conservation purposes may include [up to 50%] 80 percent of the cost of acquisition or development of the lands by the qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization. (2) (a) No grant shall be made to a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization for a development project for recreation and conservation purposes on lands owned by a local government unit unless the local government unit is a co-applicant with the qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization or has otherwise indicated its approval in writing of the proposed development project. (b) A qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization shall not use as its matching share of the cost of acquisition or development of lands for recreation and conservation purposes any constitutionally dedicated grant moneys or any grant moneys obtained from a Green Acres bond act. (3) To qualify to receive a grant pursuant to this subsection, the board of directors or governing body of the applying tax exempt nonprofit organization shall: (a) demonstrate to the commissioner that the organization qualifies as a charitable conservancy for the purposes of P.L.1979, c.378 (C.13:8B-1 et seq.); (b) demonstrate that the organization has the resources to match the grant requested; (c) agree to make and keep the lands accessible to the public, unless the commissioner determines that public accessibility would be detrimental to the lands or any natural resources associated therewith; (d) agree not to convey the lands except to the federal government, the State, a local government unit, or another qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization, for recreation and conservation purposes; and (e) agree to execute and donate to the State at no charge a conservation restriction pursuant to P.L.1979, c.378 (C.13:8B-1 et seq.) on the lands to be acquired with the grant. d.    The local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization share of the cost of an acquisition of lands, if any, may be reduced (1) by the fair market value, as determined by the commissioner, of any portion of the lands to be acquired that have been donated to, or otherwise received without cost by, the local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization; or (2) in the case of a conveyance of the lands, or any portion thereof, to the local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization at less than fair market value, by the difference between the fair market value at the time of the conveyance and the conveyance price to the local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization. e.     Whenever a local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization acquires land for recreation and conservation purposes using constitutionally dedicated moneys in whole or in part, the local government unit or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization, shall, within six months after the date of acquisition, inspect the land for the presence of any buildings or structures thereon which are or may be historic properties and, within 60 days after completion of the inspection, provide to the New Jersey Historic Preservation Office in the Department of Environmental Protection (1) a written notice of its findings, and (2) for any buildings or structures which are or may be historic properties discovered on the land, a request for determination of potential eligibility for inclusion of the historic building or structure in the New Jersey Register of Historic Places.  Whenever such a building or structure is discovered, a copy of the written notice provided to the New Jersey Historic Preservation Office shall also be sent to the New Jersey Historic Trust and to the county historical commission or advisory committee, the county historical society, the local historic preservation commission or advisory committee, and the local historical society if any of those entities exist in the county or municipality wherein the land is located. (cf:  P.L.1999, c.152, s.27) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.